Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-511
Buildings; entry and inspection by State Fire Marshal; when authorized.

In the performance of the duties imposed by the provisions of sections 81-501.01 to 81-531, the State Fire Marshal and any of his subordinates, may, at all times of the day and night, enter upon and examine any building or premises where a fire is in progress or has occurred, and other buildings and premises adjoining or near thereto.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 10, p. 483;

C.S.1929, § 81-5510;

R.S.1943, § 81-511.